Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.681

Claims against credit union in receivership—Notice.

The receiver shall publish once a week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the credit union's principal place of business is located, a notice requiring all persons having claims against the credit union to file proof of claim not later than ninety days from the date of the first publication of the notice. The receiver shall mail similar notices to all persons whose names appear as creditors upon the books of the credit union. The assets of the credit union are not subject to contingent claims.

After the expiration of the time fixed in the notice, the receiver has no power to accept any claim except the claim of a depositor or share account holder, and all other claims are barred. Claims of depositors or share account holders may be presented after the expiration of the time fixed in the notice and may be approved by the receiver. If such a claim is approved, the depositor or share account holder is entitled to its proportion of prior liquidation dividends, if sufficient funds are available for it, and will share in the distribution of the remaining assets.

The receiver may approve or reject any claim, but shall serve notice of rejection upon the claimant by mail or personally. An affidavit of service of the notice of rejection will serve as prima facie evidence that notice was given. No action may be brought on any claim after three months from the date of service of the notice of rejection.

[ 1997 c 397 s 73.]